Utah statutes.
20A-9-801.   Definitions.

As used in this part, "registered political party" means a political party that has complied with the requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures, to become a political party officially recognized by the state.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 1999 General Session

